Hawaii, session 2026, SB2310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Kainahola stream on Kauai flows through state property.  The legislature further finds that the State has not provided the resources necessary to remove overgrown vegetation from the Kainahola stream drainageway to prevent flooding of the stream.  As a result, the Kainahola stream has overflowed and at times flooded adjoining properties. In one such instance, the owner of an adjoining property filed suit against the State which resulted in the State being ordered to remove overgrown vegetation from the Kainahola stream drainageway.  The legislature appropriated approximately $1,600,000 for the cleanup, which allowed the departments of agriculture and biosecurity and land and natural resources to complete seventy-five per cent of the necessary cleanup.  However, further funds are necessary to complete the removal of overgrown vegetation. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate the funds necessary to finish removing overgrown vegetation from the Kainahola Stream drainageway in accordance with KRB LLC v. State, Civil No. 15-1-0127. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to finish removing overgrown vegetation from the Kainahola Stream drainageway in accordance with KRB LLC v. State, Civil No. 15-1-0127. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________